pt-BR: Suporte de elevação tipo: Plataforma de acesso (rampas); Elevação por chassi/ponto (braços/sapatas); Acoplamento na roda; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de suport de ridicare: Tip rampă; Ridicare de cadru/puncte (brațe/tampoane); Susținere pe roți; Altele
ja: 吊り上げサポートタイプ: ドライブオン (ランウェイ); フレーム/ポイントリフティング (アーム/パッド); ホイールエンゲージング; その他
es: Tipo de soporte de elevación: Carriles de acceso (pistas); Elevación por bastidor/puntos (brazos/almohadillas); Acoplamiento a la rueda; Otro
tr: Kaldırma destek tipi: Sürüş platformlu (raylar); Şasi/nokta kaldırma (kollar/pedler); Tekerlek kavramalı; Diğer
zh-TW: 升降支撐類型: 駛入式 (軌道); 車架/頂昇點 (托臂/托墊); 嚙合車輪式; 其他
bg-BG: Тип опора за повдигане: С платформи; Рамково/точково повдигане (рамена/подложки); Повдигане за колелата; Друг
th: ประเภทของระบบยก: แบบขับขึ้น (ทางวิ่ง); ยกโครง/จุดยก (แขน/แผ่นรอง); ล็อกล้อ; อื่นๆ
hu: Emelési alátámasztás típusa: Ráhajtós (rámpás); Keret/pontemelős (karok/tappancsok); Kerékemelős; Egyéb
sv: Typ av lyftstöd: Körbanor (drive-on); Ram-/punktlyft (armar/lyftdynor); Hjulgreppande; Övrigt
pl: Pomoc w podnoszeniu typu technicznego: Najazdowe (platformy); Podnoszenie ramy/punktowe (ramiona/podkładki); Chwytające za koło; Inne
lt-LT: Kėlimo atramos tipas: Užvažiuojamas (platformos); Rėmo / taškinis kėlimas (svirtys / pagalvėlės); Ratus fiksuojantis; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de apoio de elevação: Plataformas de acesso; Elevação por estrutura/pontos (braços/almofadas); Acoplamento nas rodas; Outro
vi: Loại giá đỡ nâng: Đường dốc cho xe chạy lên; Nâng theo khung/điểm (cần/đệm); Gắn vào bánh xe; Khác
fr: Mode de levage: Chemins de roulement; Prise sous coque/points de levage (bras/patins); Prise sous roues; Autre
cs: Typ zvedací podpěry: Nájezdové (plošiny); Zvedání za rám/body (ramena/podložky); Uchycení za kola; Jiné
ko: 리프팅 지지 유형: 드라이브온(런웨이); 프레임/포인트 리프팅(암/패드); 휠 결합형; 기타
da: Type af løfte- eller støtteudstyr: Kør-på (køreramper); Ramme-/punktløftning (arme/puder); Hjulindgreb; Andet
hr-HR: Tip podrške za podizanje: Navozna (staze); Podizanje za okvir/točke (ruke/podlošci); Podizanje za kotače; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta podpore za dvigovanje: Navozno (rampe); Dvig na okvirju/točkah (roke/blazine); Prijem na kolesa; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ zdvíhacej podpory: Nájazdové (plošiny); Zdvíhanie za rám/bodové zdvíhanie (ramená/podložky); Za kolesá; Iné
nl: Lift ondersteuningstype: Oprijden (rijbanen); Frame-/puntlift (armen/pads); Wielklemming; Overige
en: Lifting support type: Drive-on (runways); Frame/point lifting (arms/pads); Wheel-engaging; Other
fi: Nostintuen tyyppi: Ajettava (ajosilta); Runko/pistenosto (varret/tallat); Pyöristä nostava; Muu
nb: Type løftesystem: Oppkjøring (ramper); Ramme-/punktløfting (armer/puter); Hjulløftende; Annet
ru: Тип опоры подъемника: Въездной (платформы); Рамный/точечный (лапы/подушки); С захватом колес; Другое
it: Tipo di supporto di sollevamento: Con pedane (drive-on); Sollevamento a bracci/tamponi (sul telaio); A presa sulle ruote; Altro
zh-CN: 举升支撑类型: 驶入式（导轨）; 车架/点式举升（举升臂/托垫）; 车轮举升式; 其他
el: Τύπος υποστήριξης ανύψωσης: Με ράμπες (drive-on); Ανύψωση από το πλαίσιο/σημεία (βραχίονες/τακάκια); Στήριξη στους τροχούς; Άλλο
de: Typ der Hebeunterstützung: Auffahrrampen (Fahrschienen); Rahmen-/Punktanhebung (Tragarme/Aufnahmeteller); Radgreifend; Sonstige